Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 9
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE
PROGRAMS FOR CHILDREN

25.5-6-901. Disabled children care program - eligibility criteria - documentation requirements - report to the general assembly.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that a program shall be established by the state department to provide services not otherwise available to eligible disabled children outside the confines of an acute care hospital or nursing facility. Such program shall be known as the "disabled children care program" and shall be designed to safely provide services to eligible disabled children in a home- or community-based setting at a cost to the medicaid program equal to or less than the medicaid cost of inpatient hospital or nursing facility care.

The state department is authorized to seek a waiver from the federal department of health and human services to qualify for federal financial participation in the disabled children care program. Application for such waiver is contingent upon a finding that continuation of the disabled children care program results in less expenditures from the general fund than if such program were terminated.

If federal financial participation is secured, eligibility for participation in the program and the number of children to be served under the program shall be in accordance with federal regulations.

"Eligible disabled children" means any children eighteen years of age and under who:

Have medical needs which would qualify them, pursuant to state department criteria, for institutionalization or place them at risk for institutionalization in any one of the following: An acute care hospital or a nursing facility; and

Have gross incomes which do not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level. The amount of parental or spousal income and resources which shall be attributable to a child's gross income for purposes of eligibility shall be set forth in rules promulgated by the state board and shall be in relation to the parent's or spouse's financial responsibility for such child; and

Are not receiving services from any of the alternatives to long-term care waiver programs established under this title.

"Home care services" means all services available under sections 25.5-5-102, 25.5-5-103, 25.5-5-202, and 25.5-5-203 that may be received in a noninstitutional setting.

The state department shall require the following documentation on each applicant for the program:

An assessment by the disabled child's attending physician of the child's medical, functional, and social status and a determination by such physician that the quality of care which can be provided in the noninstitutional setting is equal to or exceeds the quality of care the child could receive in an acute care hospital or nursing facility;

An analysis of the cost of services for the disabled child in an institutional setting as compared to the cost of such services in a noninstitutional setting;

An assessment of the caregiver's ability to provide the needed services to the disabled child in a noninstitutional setting and an assessment of such caregiver's social history.

The information required under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be collected and reviewed by the state department at least every six months for disabled children who enter the disabled children care program in order to ensure that the quality of noninstitutional care continues to equal or exceed such care in an institutional setting and that the costs for care under the program are less than the costs for such care in an institution. When the disabled child is found to no longer qualify for institutionalization or be at risk for institutionalization pursuant to state department criteria, the child shall no longer be eligible for the disabled children care program.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1960, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-509 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-902. Children's personal assistance services and family support program - repeal.

The general assembly finds that many families who attempt to care for severely disabled or terminally ill children at home often are burdened with the excessive financial and personal costs of providing continuous care. Private insurance companies rarely support essential, long-term custodial services and often establish monetary limits that are well below the levels required by these disabled children. When coverage is available, care is frequently provided in a medical model that is marginally appropriate to the needs of the children and the family and usually more expensive to the payer. The resulting pressures often contribute to family disintegration and increased dependency on public programs. The general assembly finds that it is in the best interests of the citizens of the state to encourage the preservation of families with children with disabilities.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "eligible disabled children" means children eighteen years of age or younger:

Who have medical needs that, pursuant to state department rules, would qualify them for institutionalization or place them at risk of institutionalization in an acute care hospital or nursing facility;

Who have gross incomes, including the amount of parental income and resources to be attributed to the child's gross income according to rules to be promulgated by the state board, that do not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level;

Who are not receiving long-term services from any alternative waiver program established under this title;

For whom a licensed physician or an advanced practice registered nurse has certified that in-home care is an appropriate way to meet the child's needs; and

For whom the cost of care outside of the institution is no higher than the estimated medicaid cost of appropriate institutional care.

There is hereby established in the state department the children's personal assistance services and family support waiver program, referred to in this section as the "program", to provide services to eligible disabled children in their homes rather than in the confines of an acute care hospital or nursing facility. The number of children enrolled in this program or any other model 200 program shall not exceed the state department's ability to cover the costs of the programs within the annual appropriations for this program and any other model 200 program.

Priority for participation in the program shall be given first to children who are on the waiting list for other model 200 programs and secondly to children whose parents will return to work if appropriate care for their disabled child is provided under the program. Spaces in the program shall also be available to children who were already covered by medicaid but who were rendered temporarily ineligible for a period of not more than three months due to a periodic or cyclical peak in their parents' income.

The state board shall adopt rules to govern the program consistent with any federal waivers including, but not limited to, rules concerning:

Services that are reimbursable under this section including, but not limited to:

Respite care, to the degree its additional cost is offset by collection of a parental copayment;

Case management; and

Medically necessary professional or community services beyond those specified in section 25.5-5-102 or 25.5-5-202, to the degree that they provide a cost-effective and medically appropriate alternative to covered services;

Provider selection and certification;

Documentation for assessment and recertification;

Case management agency selection and responsibility; and

This subsection (5)(d) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Reimbursement.

The case management agency, in coordination with the eligible disabled child's family and the child's physician, shall include in each case plan a process by which the eligible disabled child may receive necessary care, which may include respite care, if the eligible disabled child's family or care provider is unavailable due to an emergency situation or to unforeseen circumstances. The eligible disabled child's family shall be duly informed by the case management agency of these alternative care provisions at the time the case plan is initiated.

If the state department finds it cost-effective and all necessary federal waivers are obtained, parents of eligible disabled children may be authorized to hire and manage care providers from certified medicaid agencies. Case management agencies shall work with parents to develop the skills necessary for ongoing care management.

The state department is authorized to seek waivers from the federal government to qualify for federal financial participation in the program.

The state department is authorized to charge and collect copayments from parents for services rendered.

The state department is directed to study the advisability of setting an upper limit on parental income for participation in this program and other children's medicaid waiver programs.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1962, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(d) amended, p. 134, § 22, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2021:

(5)(d)(II) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-509.2 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-903. Residential child health-care program - waiver - home- and community-based services - rules.

Subject to federal authorization, the state department shall implement a program for medicaid-eligible children with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, with significant behavioral support needs who are at risk of institutionalization. The state board shall establish, by rule, the type of services provided pursuant to the program, to the extent the services are cost-efficient, and the recipient eligibility criteria that may include, but are not limited to, a medical necessity determination and a financial eligibility determination.

The state department may limit the number of participants in the program in accordance with any federal waiver obtained by the state department to implement this section.

The state board shall promulgate rules as necessary for the implementation and administration of the program, including but not limited to rules regarding program services; eligibility criteria, including financial eligibility criteria; and reimbursement of providers.

This section will take effect if the federal department of health and human services approves a redesigned children's habilitation residential program waiver for medicaid-eligible children with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, who have complex behavioral support needs, pursuant to House Bill 18-1328, as enacted in 2018. The executive director of the state department shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing of the date on which the condition specified in this section has occurred by e-mailing the notice to revisorofstatutes.ga@state.co.us. This section takes effect, effective upon the date identified in the notice that the federal department of health and human services approved the waiver or, if the notice does not specify that date, upon the date of the notice to the revisor of statutes.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1328), ch. 184, p. 1243, § 3, effective June 7, 2019.

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 184 (HB 18-1328), Session Laws of Colorado 2018, provides that section 3 of the act adding this section takes effect upon notice to the revisor of statutes pursuant to § 25.5-5-306 (6) as enacted in section 2 of the act. For more information, see HB 18-1328. (L. 2018, p. 1247.) On August 14, 2019, the revisor of statutes received the notice referred to in subsection (4) and § 25.5-5-306 (6) that the federal department of health and human services approved the waiver on June 7, 2019.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1328, see section 1 of chapter 184, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.